Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-710.02
Retirement benefits; exemption from legal process; exception.

All annuities or benefits which any person shall be entitled to receive under the Judges Retirement Act shall not be subject to garnishment, attachment, levy, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law whatsoever and shall not be assignable except to the extent that such annuities or benefits are subject to a qualified domestic relations order under the Spousal Pension Rights Act.

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 506, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 833, § 23;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 37;

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 22;

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 16;

Laws 2012, LB916, § 16;

Laws 2015, LB40, § 7.

Spousal Pension Rights Act, see section 42-1101.